Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.270

Demand on bond after claims ascertained—Power of director to settle, compromise.

Upon ascertaining all claims and statements in the manner herein set forth, the director may then make demand upon the bond on behalf of those claimants whose statements have been filed, and shall have the power to settle or compromise said claims with the surety company on the bond, and is empowered in such cases to execute and deliver a release and discharge of the bond involved.

[ 1959 c 139 s 27.]